Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-6] General powers and duties.
The air carrier commission shall have general supervision over all Hawaii air
carriers providing air transportation and, to the extent determined by the
commission to be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, over any
related company, and shall perform the duties and exercise the powers imposed
or conferred upon it by this chapter. The general powers of the commission
shall include:

(1) Regulating Hawaii air carriers by using, in
addition to its other powers, the investigative powers set forth in section
261E-7;

(2) Establishing reasonable classifications of Hawaii
air carriers based upon the nature of the services provided by the carriers and
adopting rules pursuant to chapter 91 to regulate those classes of Hawaii air
carriers; and

(3) Exempting from this chapter, in whole or in part,
when determined to be in the public interest, any Hawaii air carrier engaging
in air transportation solely with aircraft with a maximum seating capacity of
not more than seventeen passengers or maximum cargo capacity of not more than
three thousand pounds. [L Sp 2008, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next